Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.739

Reducing costs—Agencies to consult with department.

For every printing job and binding job ordered by a state agency, the agency shall consult with the department on how to choose more economic and efficient options to reduce costs.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 311.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.